Utah statutes.
48-2e-1203.   Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001 et seq., but this chapter does not modify, limit, or supersede Sec. 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Sec. 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

